California, session 20252026, AB1901.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 12.7 (commencing with Section 108948) is added to Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 12.7. Children’s Diapers108948. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Children’s diaper” means an absorbent garment or product that is designed, manufactured, processed, fabricated, packaged, or marketed to be worn by children, including infants and toddlers, and to absorb or contain urine and fecal waste, including, but not limited to, a disposable brief, protective underwear, liner, booster, insert, or underpad. “Children’s diaper” includes any of a diaper’s components, including, but not limited to, wetness indicators, absorbent linings or fillings, outer shells, adhesive tabs, dyes, or fragrance.(2) “Intentionally added ingredients” means a chemical, or chemicals, that a manufacturer has intentionally added to children’s diapers and that has a functional or technical effect in the product, including a component of an intentionally added chemical, or an intentional breakdown product of an added chemical, that also has a functional or technical effect in children’s diapers.(3) “Package” has the same meaning as Section 1459(b) of Title 15 of the United States Code.(b) On or before January 1, 2029, the manufacturer of any children’s diapers sold, distributed, or manufactured in the state shall display on a web page on its internet website, and on the product details page on the internet website where the children’s diapers are sold, a list of all of the children’s diaper’s intentionally added ingredients. The web page and the list shall be displayed and organized in an easily and publicly identifiable manner. The list shall include all of the following information for each intentionally added ingredient in the children’s diaper:(1) Chemical or raw material name.(2) The Chemical Abstract Service (CAS) number.(3) All specific functions or purposes for use in the children’s diapers.(c) All required information in subdivisions (b) and (d) shall be clearly grouped and displayed in order of chemical or raw material weight for each intentionally added ingredient. Each intentionally added ingredient’s chemical or raw material name, CAS number, and function or purpose shall be listed alongside each other.(d) On or before January 1, 2029, all children’s diapers distributed or manufactured in the state shall include on the outermost package all of the following in an easily and publicly identifiable manner:(1) A list of all of the intentionally added ingredients in the children’s diapers.(2) An internet website address for a web page that provides all of the information required by subdivision (b).(e) On or before July 1, 2029, all children’s diapers sold in the state shall include on the outermost package, in an easily and publicly identifiable manner, the information required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d).(f) (1) The Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Attorney General, a city attorney, county counsel, or district attorney Control may enforce this chapter.(2) A person in violation of this chapter shall be liable for an administrative or civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the first violation and not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation.(3) Penalties may be assessed for each violation or, for continuing violations, for each day that a violation continues.(4) A prevailing party shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(5) This subdivision does not impair or impede any other rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under any other law. The remedies provided in this subdivision are cumulative with any other remedies available under any other law.(g) The Department of Toxic Substances Control may adopt regulations to implement, enforce, interpret, or make specific this chapter.(h) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds in the Toxic Substances Control Account, established pursuant to Section 25173.6, may be used by the department to implement this chapter.(i) Moneys from penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Toxic Substances Control Account, established pursuant to Section 25173.6.(j) A person shall not sell, distribute, or manufacture children’s diapers in the state that do not comply with the requirements of this section.(k) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.